Wyoming, session 2025, SF0116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-1101 and 6-3-1102 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 11
MONEY LAUNDERING AND ILLEGAL INVESTMENT

6-3-1101. Money laundering; penalties.

SF0116

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0413
(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Derived from" means obtained directly or
indirectly from, maintained by or realized through;

(ii) "Property" means anything of value,
including real estate, tangible and intangible personal
property, trade secrets, contract rights, choses in action
and other interests in or claims to wealth, admission or
transportation tickets, captured or domestic animals, food
and drink, electric, gas, steam or other power, financial
instruments, information, data and computer software, in
either human readable or computer readable form, copies or
originals, and includes any benefit or interest without
reduction for expenses incurred for acquisition,
maintenance or any other purpose.

(b) A person is guilty of a money laundering if the
person:

(i) Transports or possesses property the person
knows or reasonably should know to be derived from criminal
activity;
SF0116

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0413

(ii) Directs, organizes, finances, plans,
manages, supervises or controls the transportation of or
transactions in property he knows or reasonably should know
to be derived from criminal activity; or

(iii) Engages in a transaction involving
property the person knows or reasonably should know to be
derived from criminal activity:

(A) With the intent to facilitate or
promote the criminal activity; or

(B) Knowing that the transaction is
designed, in whole or in part:

(I) To conceal or disguise the nature,
location, source, ownership or control of the property
derived from criminal activity; or

(II) To avoid a transaction reporting
requirement under the laws of this state, any other state
or of the United States. The transaction or transactions
SF0116

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0413
need not exceed the transaction reporting threshold at any
single financial institution on any single day in order to
constitute a violation of this subdivision.

(c) For purposes of this article, property is known
to be derived from criminal activity if the person knows or
reasonably should know that the property represents
proceeds from some form of criminal activity.

(d) Money laundering is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

6-3-1102. Illegal investment; penalties.

(a) A person is guilty of illegal investment if, with
the intent to evade a transaction reporting requirement of
this state or of 31 U.S.C. § 5311 et seq. or 31 C.F.R. §
103 et seq., or any rules or regulations adopted under
those chapters and sections, the person:

(i) Causes a financial institution, including a
foreign or domestic money transmitter or an authorized
SF0116

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0413
agent thereof, casino, check casher, person engaged in a
trade or business or any other person required to report
regarding currency transactions or suspicious transactions
to fail to report or to file a report that contains a
material omission or misstatement of fact; or

(ii) Structures or assists in structuring any
transaction with one (1) or more financial institutions,
including foreign or domestic money transmitters or an
authorized agent thereof, casinos, check cashers, persons
engaged in a trade or business or any other person required
to report regarding currency transactions or suspicious
transactions. For purposes of this paragraph, "structure"
or "structuring" means that a person, acting alone, or in
conjunction with or on behalf of, other persons, conducts
one (1) or more transactions in currency, in any amount, at
one (1) or more financial institutions, on one (1) or more
days, in any manner, for the purpose of evading currency
transaction reporting requirements provided by state or
federal law. The transaction or transactions need not
exceed the reporting threshold at any single financial
institution on any single day in order to meet the
SF0116

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0413
definition of "structure" or "structuring" provided in this
paragraph.

(b) Illegal investment is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0116